Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.080

Receipt for custodial property.

A written confirmation of delivery by a custodian constitutes a sufficient receipt and discharge of the transferor for custodial property transferred to the custodian under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 193 s 8.]